Arkansas statutes. Title 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 3 Prohibited Practices
3-3-212. Manufacturer-seller relationships generally.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for a manufacturer to:

(1)

Be interested, directly or indirectly, in any premises where malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors are sold at retail or in any business devoted wholly or partially to the sale of such liquors at retail, by stock ownership, interlocking directors, mortgage or lien on any personal or real property, or any other means; or

(2)

Make any loan to any owner.

(b)(1)

Any lien, mortgage, or other interest or estate, however, now held by a manufacturer on or in the personal or real property of any owner, which mortgage, lien, interest, or estate was acquired on or before December 31, 1933, shall not be included within the provisions of this section.

(2)

The burden of establishing the time of the accrual of the interest, comprehended by subdivision (b)(1) of this section, shall be upon the person who claims to be entitled to the protection and exemption afforded by this section.

(c)

Subsections (a) and (b) of this section shall not apply to an agreement or arrangement by:

(1)

A manufacturer or wholesaler to pay for the display or other presentation of advertising and promotional material on or about the premises of the holder of a franchise granted by the Arkansas Racing Commission; or

(2)

A manufacturer providing sponsorship of or payment for the display or other presentation of advertising and promotional material on or about the premises of a large attendance facility, as defined by §3-9-202(16), owned by a qualifying charitable nonprofit organization that has received tax-exempt status under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3), as in effect on January 1, 2019.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 18; Pope's Dig., § 14122; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-908; Acts 2001, No. 1838, § 1; 2019, No. 744, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “an” for “any” in the introductory language of (c); added the designation for (c)(1); and added (c)(2).

Cross References.

Malt, vinous, or spirituous liquors defined, §3-1-102.

3-3-213. Manufacturer-seller relationships — Exclusivity agreements — Definitions.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person engaged in the manufacture of alcoholic liquors:

(1)

To require any wholesaler or retailer to purchase from that manufacturer to the exclusion, in whole or in part, of any alcoholic liquors sold or offered for sale by other persons; or

(2)

To induce any retailer to purchase from that manufacturer or wholesaler to the exclusion, in whole or in part, of any alcoholic liquors sold or offered for sale by other persons, by:

(A)

Acquiring any interest in property owned, occupied, or used by the retailer in his or her business, or in any license with respect to the premises of the retailer;

(B)

Furnishing, giving, renting, lending, or selling to the retailer any equipment, fixtures, signs, supplies, money, service, or other thing of value, subject to exceptions provided by the rules of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board and established trade customs;

(C)

Paying or crediting the retailer for any advertising, display, or distribution service;

(D)

Guaranteeing any loan or the repayment of any financial obligation of the retailer; or

(E)

Offering or giving any bonus, premium, or compensation to the retailer or any of his or her officers, employees, or representatives.

(b)

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

(1)

“Person” includes any and all corporations, partnerships, associations, or individuals and all agents, representatives, or employees of such persons; and

(2)

“Manufacturer” means, unless otherwise specified, any person engaged in the business of distilling, brewing, making, blending, rectifying, or producing for sale in wholesale quantities alcoholic liquors of any kind, including whiskey, brandy, cordials, liquors, and other liquids containing alcohol, except patent medicines, beer, and wine.

History.

Acts 1953, No. 362, §§ 1, 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-952; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 43.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (a)(2)(B).

3-3-214. Sale of denatured alcohol.

(a)

It is unlawful for any person to sell, give away, or dispose of denatured alcohol for any beverage purposes whatsoever.

(b)

Any person who shall sell, give away, or dispose of denatured alcohol for any beverage purpose whatsoever shall be guilty of a violation and for the first offense be punished by a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250). For the second and subsequent offenses, he or she shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

(c)

Any person who shall sell, give away, or dispose of denatured alcohol to an habitual drunkard or an intoxicated person shall be prima facie guilty of selling denatured alcohol for beverage purposes and subject to the penalties provided in this section.

History.

Acts 1939, No. 139, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-945 — 48-947; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 368.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (b), substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, inserted “or she” and “Class B” and deleted “and punished by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than six (6) months nor more than one (1) year, or both so fined and imprisoned in the discretion of the jury” from the end.

3-3-215. Obtaining federal license without state license.

(a)

Any person within this state who has had issued to him or her a current federal license to sell liquor or beer in Arkansas and who has not had issued a current state license to sell liquor or beer shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined in any amount not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

(b)

In any criminal prosecution under this section, the introduction of a certified copy or microfilm of a current federal license to sell beer or liquor in this state shall be prima facie evidence that the licensee is possessing beer or liquor in this state for sale unlawfully.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 241, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-948, 48-949.

3-3-216. Possession or sale of untaxed intoxicating liquor — Definition.

(a)

As used in this section, “intoxicating liquor” means any beverage containing more than five-tenths percent (0.5%) of alcohol by weight.

(b)

It is unlawful for a person to buy, bargain, sell, loan, own, have in possession, or knowingly transport in this state an intoxicating liquor upon which the Arkansas excise tax prescribed by law has not been paid.

(c)(1)

Except as provided in subdivision (c)(2) of this section, a violation of this section is a Class B misdemeanor.

(2)

A violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor if a person transports intoxicating liquor into this state from another state without the Arkansas excise tax having been paid on the intoxicating liquor and the person was transporting the intoxicating liquor for the purpose of resale in this state.

(d)(1)

In addition to the applicable criminal penalties under subsection (c) of this section, a person who violates this section is subject to a civil penalty equal to the amount of all excise tax levied on the intoxicating liquor at the rates imposed on alcoholic beverages under §3-7-101 et seq.

(2)

The Department of Finance and Administration shall assess and administer the civil penalty set forth in this subsection under the Arkansas Tax Procedure Act, §26-18-101 et seq., and shall promulgate any rules necessary for the proper administration and enforcement of the civil penalty.

History.

Acts 1941, No. 357, § 4; 1943, No. 219, § 1; 1947, No. 206, § 1; 1969, No. 475, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-934; Acts 1987, No. 965, § 1; 2005, No. 1994, § 369; 2007, No. 666, § 1; 2009, No. 548, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment, in (b), inserted “Class B” and deleted “and upon conviction shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisoned for not more than six (6) months, or both so fined and imprisoned” from the end.

The 2007 amendment inserted “as defined in §3-8-201” in (a); added “and in addition to the applicable criminal … §§3-7-101 et seq.” in (b); added (c); and, in (d), inserted “of any kind, as defined in §3-8-201” three times.

The 2009 amendment inserted the introductory language of (a), redesignated the remainder of (a) as (b), and deleted “of any kind, as defined in §3-8-201” following “liquor” in (b); in (c), inserted (c)(2) and rewrote and redesignated the remaining text; inserted (d)(1) and redesignated the remaining text; deleted former (d), which read: “However, it shall constitute a Class A misdemeanor for any person to transport intoxicating liquor of any kind, as defined in §3-8-201, from another state without the Arkansas excise tax having been paid on the intoxicating liquor if the court determines that the defendant was transporting the liquor of any kind for the purpose of resale”; and made related and minor stylistic changes.

3-3-217. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The amendment to this section by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 241, was superseded by the repeal of this section by Acts 2005, No. 541, § 2. As amended by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 241, this section read:

“3-3-217. Free lunches prohibited — Penalty.

“(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person, company, or corporation to give free lunches in any place where liquors are sold by such persons, company, or corporation.

“(b)

Any person, company, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor.”

Publisher's Notes.

This section, concerning the prohibition of providing free lunches in establishments where liquors are sold, was repealed by Acts 2005, No. 541, § 2. The section was derived from Acts 1911, No. 143, §§ 2, 3.

3-3-218. Duty of care of privilege license holders — Enforcement.

(a)

It is the specifically declared policy of the General Assembly that all licenses issued to establishments for the sale or dispensing of alcoholic beverages are privilege licenses, and the holder of such privilege license is to be held to a high duty of care in the operation of the licensed establishment.

(b)

It is the duty of every holder of an alcoholic beverage permit issued by the State of Arkansas to operate the business wherein alcoholic beverages are sold or dispensed in a manner which is in the public interest and does not endanger the public health, welfare, or safety. Failure to maintain this duty of care shall be a violation of this section and grounds for administrative sanctions being taken against the holder of the permit or permits.

(c)(1)

The standard of review for the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and the Alcoholic Beverage Control Board in matters arising herein shall be:

(A)

Whether the permitted outlet, as it has been operated, promotes the public convenience and advantage;

(B)

Whether the continuation of the outlet would promote the public interest; and

(C)

Whether the outlet's business operation endangers the public health, welfare, or safety of the area or community in which it is located.

(2)

It is specifically granted to the director and the board the power to review the outlet and its operation as if it were a new application, taking into consideration all factors involved in the review of an application as initially filed before the agency.

(d)(1)

As to all violations occurring inside the permitted premises, the standard of proof shall be by substantial evidence.

(2)

As to all violations occurring outside the permitted premises, the standard of proof shall be by clear and convincing evidence.

(e)

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division and its board are hereby authorized to adopt rules to implement each and every provision of this section.

(f)

The director and the board are empowered by this section to administer the full range of penalties available for other administrative proceedings before it, including, but not limited to, fines, suspension, cancellation, or revocation of such permits which have been found to endanger the public health, welfare, or safety.

History.

Acts 1989, No. 695, § 1; 2003, No. 1756, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 44.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (e).

3-3-219. Social hosts — Criminal liability.

(a)(1)

A person who exercises control over private property shall not knowingly allow a person under twenty-one (21) years of age who is not a family member of the person to consume alcohol on the private property.

(2)

This subsection applies only to a person who is present and in control of the private property at the time the consumption occurs.

(3)

This subsection does not apply to the owner of rental property or the agent of an owner of rental property unless the consumption occurs in the individual unit in which the owner or agent resides.

(4)

This subsection does not apply to any consumption of alcohol during religious ceremonies or for religious purposes.

(b)(1)

A first violation of this section is a Class C misdemeanor.

(2)

A second violation of this section is a Class A misdemeanor.

(3)

A third or subsequent violation of this section is a Class D felony.

(c)

This section shall not prevent a township, city, or county from establishing by ordinance regulations more stringent than the provisions of this section.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 976, § 1.

Subchapter 3

— Dry Territories

Cross References.

Sale, barter, or loan in dry territory — Penalties, §3-8-312.

Preambles.

Acts 1947, No. 91 contained a preamble which read:

“Whereas, the present law is uncertain as to the amount of intoxicating liquors which can be possessed legally by a person in any dry county or part thereof in this state;

“Now, therefore … .”

Effective Dates.

Acts 1899, No. 191, § 3: effective on passage. Approved May 8, 1899.

Acts 1917, No. 13, § 21: Jan. 24, 1917. Emergency declared.

Acts 1919, No. 87, § 6 [8]: Feb. 17, 1919. Emergency declared.

Acts 1947, No. 423, § 17: Mar. 28, 1947. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas it has been ascertained that the present liquor laws of this state are inadequate for the proper control of alcoholic beverages, and that flagrant violations of the present alcoholic control laws are occurring in increasing number throughout the state and that intoxicating liquors are being shipped through and from this state into other states in violation of their laws, and this law being necessary to remedy this situation and restore the proper operation of the police powers of this state and to provide for the public peace, health, safety, and well-being, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act shall be in full force and effect upon and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 248, § 8: became law without Governor's signature, Mar. 12, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the cities and counties in this state are in need of additional funds to construct and maintain streets and roads and to engage in other worthwhile activities; that a large amount of confiscated alcoholic beverages are not being turned over to the Director of Alcoholic Beverage Control as is required by law; that the cities and counties of this state can more effectively sell any alcoholic beverages seized and forfeited than can the state; and that in order to permit cities and counties this additional source of revenues and to encourage the more effective enforcement of the alcoholic beverage laws of this state, it is necessary that this act become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1971, No. 585, § 34: approved Apr. 6, 1971. Emergency clause provided: “It has been found and is hereby declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that in order to establish an orderly procedure which will insure the monthly and quarterly distribution of funds for the necessary services and operations of the state government, as provided for in this act, it is necessary that the provisions of this act become effective immediately; that under the provisions of this act seriously needed improvements for many of our public institutions are contemplated, and only the provisions of this act will provide such funds which will be adequate to alleviate this situation; and that only the provisions of this act will correct many of our financial difficulties, and which otherwise may deprive the citizens of this state from receiving the benefits for which the operation of state government contemplates. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

3-3-301. Definition.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “person” means any individual, corporation, partnership, association, firm, or other business entity, or its agents or representatives.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 423, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-920.

3-3-302. Penalties.

(a)

Unless a different penalty is specifically provided, any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this subchapter shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

(b)

In addition to all other fines and penalties herein provided, the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall revoke all alcoholic beverage permits held by any person convicted for a violation of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 423, §§ 13, 14; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-932, 48-933; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 211.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “Class A misdemeanor” for “misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be fined in a sum not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or be confined in the county jail for a period of not less than six (6) months nor more than one (1) year, or be both fined and imprisoned” in (a).

Cross References.

Revocation and suspension proceedings generally, §§3-2-212 —3-2-217.

3-3-303. Rules.

The Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall promulgate all rules necessary to enforce and administer this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 423, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-931; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 45.

Amendments.

The 2019 amendment deleted “and regulations” following “Rules” in the section heading and in the section.

3-3-304 — 3-3-308. [Repealed.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

The amendments to §§3-3-305 and3-3-306 by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 29, were superseded by the repeal of §§3-3-305 and3-3-306 by Acts 2005, No. 1964, §§ 2, 3. As amended by Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 29, these sections read:

“3-3-305. Transportation by motor vehicle.

“(a)

It is unlawful for a motor vehicle to carry at any one time in any county or part of a county in which it is unlawful to manufacture, sell, barter, loan, or give away intoxicating liquors, more than one (1) gallon of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor and three (3) gallons or one (1) case of beer.

“(b)

Any alcoholic beverages in excess of the amounts prescribed above found inside or on a vehicle in violation of this section shall be confiscated pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

“(c)

The provisions of this section shall not apply to properly licensed retailers and wholesalers when so authorized by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division, to common carriers or bonded carriers duly licensed by the Arkansas State Highway and Transportation Department, to a private or contract carrier holding a proper permit from the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division to transport intoxicating liquors within the State of Arkansas where the liquors are consigned to a point beyond the dry territory, or to individuals in transit when the individuals are not residents of the dry territory.

“(d)

The operator of any motor vehicle violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a violation and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

“(e)

This section shall not be deemed to repeal any acts pertaining to possession of alcoholic beverages in dry territory, but shall be cumulative thereto.

“3-3-306. Possession of alcoholic beverages other than beer.

“(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation to possess more than one (1) gallon of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors other than beer, in any county or part of a county in which it is unlawful to manufacture, sell, barter, loan, or give away intoxicating liquors.

“(b)

Such liquor or liquors found in the possession of any person shall be confiscated pursuant to an order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

“(c)

The provisions of this section shall not apply to common carriers in transit through such county providing further that the provisions of this section shall not apply to licensed bonded dealers or individuals in transit, when those individuals are not residents of the dry county.

“(d)

Any person, firm, or corporation violating the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a violation and shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).”

Publisher's Notes.

These sections, concerning the storage, possession, and transportation of alcoholic beverages in dry counties, were repealed by Acts 2005, No. 1964, §§ 1-5. The sections were derived from the following sources:

3-3-304. Acts 1947, No. 423, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-921.

3-3-305. Acts 1953, No. 28, §§ 1-4; 1971, No. 57, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-922.1 — 48-922.3, 48-922.3n.

3-3-306. Acts 1947, No. 91, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-918, 48-919.

3-3-307. Acts 1949, No. 347, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-919.1.

3-3-308. Acts 1947, No. 423, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-922.

3-3-309. Procuring liquor for another.

(a)(1)

It shall be unlawful for any person to either directly or indirectly procure or purchase for another in any district or territory where they are prohibited by law:

(A)

Any alcohol or spirituous, ardent, vinous, malt, or fermented liquors;

(B)

Any compound or preparation thereof commonly called tonics, bitters, or medicated liquors; or

(C)

Intoxicating spirits of any character.

(2)

However, this section shall not prohibit one (1) person from buying for another from a licensed dealer.

(b)

Any person who shall violate any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a violation and fined in any sum not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500).

History.

Acts 1899, No. 191, §§ 1, 2, p. 335; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6163, 6164; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-914, 48-915; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 30.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “violation” for “misdemeanor” in (b).

Cross References.

Sale in dry territory prohibited, §3-8-209.

3-3-310. Solicitation or taking orders.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person, firm, or corporation in this state in person, by letter, circular, or other printed matter, or in any other manner, to solicit or take orders in this state for any alcoholic, vinous, malt, spirituous, or fermented liquors or any compound or preparation thereof commonly called tonic, bitters, or medicated liquors, or any other liquors, bitters, or drinks prohibited by the laws of this state to be sold, bartered, or otherwise disposed of.

(b)

The prohibition of this section shall apply to such liquors, bitters, and drinks, whether the parties intend that the liquors, bitters, or drinks shall be shipped into this state from outside of the state or from one (1) point in this state to another point in this state.

(c)

The taking or soliciting of orders for the above-described liquors is within the inhibition of this section, although the orders are subject to approval by some other person, and no part of the price is paid, nor any part of the goods is delivered when the order is taken.

(d)

If such order is in writing, parol evidence thereof is admissible without producing or accounting for the absence of the original.

(e)

Upon conviction, any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of this section, except as otherwise expressly provided in this section, shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1917, No. 13, §§ 10, 19, p. 41; 1919, No. 87, § 5[7]; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6174, 6183; Pope's Dig., § 14155; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-916, 48-917; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 370.

Publisher's Notes.

This section was enacted when intoxicating liquor was prohibited in the entire state. Acts 1933 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 7, § 23, repealed it with respect to beer and light wine. Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 18-A, repealed it “in its entirety, excepting only as to those counties in which the sale of alcoholic liquors may later be prohibited under the local option provisions.” Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 3, § 18-A, further provided that it should not be “construed to prohibit the advertising of any alcoholic liquors legalized by this act in any newspaper within this state.”

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment substituted “guilty of a Class B misdemeanor” for “fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each offense and may be confined not less than thirty (30) days nor more than ninety (90) days in the county jail” in (e); and deleted former (f).

Cross References.

Local option laws, §3-8-101 et seq.

3-3-311. Seizure and forfeiture of beverages authorized.

(a)

All spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors or beverages found in the possession of any person violating this or any other alcoholic beverage control law of this state are declared to be contraband and shall be seized and forfeited.

(b)

Alcoholic or malt beverages subject to confiscation under this subchapter shall include those on which the Arkansas liquor excise tax has been paid as well as those on which the tax has not been paid.

(c)

The confiscation of alcoholic beverages hereunder shall be in addition to any other criminal penalties now or hereafter prescribed by law.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 423, §§ 6, 11; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-925, 48-930.

3-3-312. Procedure upon seizure of beverages.

(a)

All spirituous, vinous, or malt beverages found in the possession of any person in violation of the laws as provided in this subchapter shall be seized and immediately turned over to the mayor if seized within the city limits of a municipality by a law enforcement officer of that municipality. They shall be turned over to the county judge if seized without or within the city limits of any municipality by the sheriff or any Department of Arkansas State Police officer or any Alcoholic Beverage Control Enforcement Division agent.

(b)

The seized beverages are to be held by the mayor or county judge until such time as any municipal court of the county wherein the beverages were seized determines the beverages to be contraband and subject to sale.

(c)

The mayor or the county judge, as the case may be, shall cause a notice to be published. This shall be done within three (3) days after being authorized by the court to sell the seized intoxicating liquors. The notice shall be published in a newspaper having a countywide circulation and shall appear in the newspaper twice within a thirty-day period, fifteen (15) days apart. The notice shall contain a list of the beverages authorized to be sold by the court, the approximate retail value thereof, the person, if known, from whom taken, the place where seized, and the advice that the beverages will be sold by the mayor or the county judge, as the case may be, at the expiration of thirty (30) days from the first published notice.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 423, § 7; 1969, No. 248, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-926.

3-3-313. Determination of interests in seized beverages.

(a)

Any person claiming any interest in any alcoholic beverages seized under this subchapter may present a written petition. This may be done at any time within thirty (30) days from the date of seizure of the alcoholic beverages. The petition shall be presented to the municipal court of the county wherein the beverages were seized, shall set out the nature of the interest, and shall request that a hearing be held by the court to determine his or her right or interest therein.

(b)

The municipal judge of that court shall set a date for the hearing, which date shall be within ten (10) days from the date the hearing is requested, unless good and sufficient cause is shown and recorded for a further delay.

(c)

At the hearing all witnesses shall be duly sworn and the testimony recorded by a stenographer.

(d)

Within fifteen (15) days after the completion of the hearing, the municipal judge shall enter his or her written findings of fact and order upon the testimony so presented.

(e)

The findings of fact and order of the municipal judge may be appealed to the circuit court of the county wherein the alcoholic beverages were seized. Appeal may be had by filing a transcript of record of the hearing held before the judge with the court within fifteen (15) days after the municipal judge's order has been duly entered.

(f)

The circuit court shall hear no new evidence on this appeal and shall render its judgment only on errors of law.

(g)

An appeal from the judgment of the circuit court may be taken as provided by law.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 423, §§ 8, 9; 1969, No. 248, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-927, 48-928.

3-3-314. Sale of confiscated beverages.

(a)

Immediately upon the expiration of thirty (30) days from the date of the first notice provided in §3-3-312, the mayor or the county judge, as the case may be, shall immediately notify licensed liquor wholesalers and retailers in the county, or, if the county is dry, then the licensed liquor wholesalers and retailers in the nearest wet county, that the contraband will be sold to the highest bidder and shall request all licensed liquor wholesalers and retailers to submit sealed bids.

(b)

No confiscated alcoholic beverages shall be sold at less than fifty percent (50%) of the retailers' selling price of such liquor as defined in Acts 1949, No. 282, § 4, as amended [repealed].

(c)

In the event that alcoholic beverages are confiscated upon which the Arkansas tax has not been paid, the retailer or wholesaler buying the beverages is required to pay the tax.

(d)

All funds derived from the sale of the confiscated alcoholic beverages shall be deposited as follows:

(1)

Fifty percent (50%) in the general fund of the city or the county, as the case may be; and

(2)

Fifty percent (50%) thereof as general revenues in the State Treasury to the credit of the State Apportionment Fund. There the funds shall be allocated and distributed to the various funds, fund accounts, and accounts participating in general revenues in the respective proportions to each as provided by law and shall be used for the respective purposes set forth in the Revenue Stabilization Law, §19-5-101 et seq.

(e)

The county or city officials are required to file a report at the end of each month with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division showing the number of arrests, the amount of alcoholic beverages confiscated, and the amount of money collected from the sale of such beverages.

History.

Acts 1947, No. 423, § 10, as added by Acts 1953, No. 118, § 36(D), as added by Acts 1971, No. 585, § 12; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-929.

3-3-315. Failure to surrender confiscated beverages.

Any person who shall seize or confiscate any spirituous, vinous, or malt beverages under the provisions of §§3-3-311 and3-3-312 and who shall not immediately turn over the spirituous, vinous, or malt beverages as required by §3-3-312 to the mayor or the county judge, as the case may be, shall be guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 248, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-929.1; Acts 2005, No. 1994, § 334.

Amendments.

The 2005 amendment inserted “Class A” and deleted the former second sentence, which stated: “Upon conviction, he shall be subject to a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) or imprisonment of not less than three (3) months nor more than one (1) year, or both such fine and imprisonment.”

Subchapter 4

— Illicit Manufacture and Equipment

Effective Dates.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 10: approved Mar. 16, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the repeal of the Eighteenth Amendment to the Constitution of the United States has created an emergency which requires immediate control of intoxicating liquors; and

“Whereas, the present state revenue does not meet the needs for the maintenance and development of the State Government and its agencies and the state's credit is threatened with impairment, an emergency is declared to exist and this act shall become a law and be effective on its passage and approval or nonaction by the Governor.”

Acts 1949, No. 200, § 4: Mar. 1, 1949. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, the present law regulating the possession of illicit stills and the unlawful manufacture of liquor is inadequate to deter violations thereof, now, therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1975, No. 928, § 1: effective simultaneously with the Arkansas Criminal Code on Jan. 1, 1976.

3-3-401. Definition.

(a)

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires, “illicit still” means an apparatus designed for the unlawful manufacture of intoxicating liquor, which shall include an outfit or parts of an outfit commonly used, or intended to be used, in the distillation or manufacture of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors and which is not duly registered in the office of the Commissioner of Internal Revenue.

(b)

The burden of proving that the still or apparatus is so registered shall be on the defendant or defendants under charge.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 6, § 5; Pope's Dig., § 14138; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-937.

Cross References.

Spirituous, vinous, and malt liquors defined, §3-1-102.

3-3-402. Manufacture, possession, and transportation.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any person, including any corporation or legal entity:

(1)

To own, possess, or knowingly transport any illicit still, still worm, or any apparatus or any substantial part of any illicit still designed for the unlawful manufacture of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor;

(2)

To manufacture or engage in the manufacture of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor in the State of Arkansas without obtaining a license to do so from the State of Arkansas and the United States; or

(3)

To own, possess, or knowingly transport any illicitly distilled spirituous, vinous, or malt liquors.

(b)

Any person committing an offense defined by this section is guilty of a Class D felony.

History.

Acts 1949, No. 200, §§ 1, 2; 1961, No. 458, § 1; 1969, No. 475, § 2; 1975, No. 928, § 20; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 48-936.1, 48-936.2.

Cross References.

Class D felony, fines, §5-4-201.

Class D felony, imprisonment, §5-4-401.

3-3-403. Seizure and forfeiture of vehicles.

(a)

All vehicles or vessels used in the transportation or storage of any illicitly distilled spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor or any illicit still, still worm, or other apparatus designed for the unlawful manufacture of spirituous, vinous, or malt liquor shall be seized and forfeited and shall be sold by the Director of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division at public auction or to state agencies desiring to purchase the vehicles or vessels.

(b)

All proceeds derived from the sale of the seized and forfeited vehicles or vessels shall be special revenues and shall be deposited in the State Treasury to the credit of the Public School Fund.

History.

Acts 1969, No. 475, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-936.3.

3-3-404. Destruction and sale of still.

(a)

The court, upon conviction of any defendant for illegal manufacture or sale or gift of intoxicating alcoholic liquors, shall order the destruction of any illicit stills or apparatus designed for the manufacture of intoxicating liquor belonging to or under the control of the defendant.

(b)

The court may order the copper or other property sold.

(c)

The proceeds of the sale shall be paid to the county treasurer of the county for the benefit of the road fund.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 6, § 9; Pope's Dig., § 14142; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-938.

3-3-405. Defendant's reputation as evidence.

In any prosecution or proceeding for any violation of this act, the general reputation of the defendant for moonshining, bootlegging, or being engaged in the illicit manufacture of or trade in intoxicating liquors shall be admissible in evidence against the defendant.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 108, Art. 6, § 7; Pope's Dig., § 14140; A.S.A. 1947, § 48-940.

Meaning of “this act”.

Acts 1935, No. 108, codified as §§3-1-101 —3-1-103,3-2-101,3-2-205,3-3-101 —3-3-103,3-3-212,3-3-401,3-3-404,3-3-405,3-4-101 —3-4-103,3-4-201,3-4-202,3-4-207 —3-4-211,3-4-213,3-4-214,3-4-215 [repealed],3-4-217,3-4-219,3-4-220,3-4-301 —3-4-303,3-4-501,3-4-503,3-4-601 —3-4-605,3-8-301,3-8-302 [repealed],3-8-303,3-8-304 [repealed],3-8-305 —3-8-310,3-8-311 [repealed],3-8-313 —3-8-317,23-12-708.